Nevada, session 83, AB505.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 40.615 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.615 “Constructional defect” means a defect in the design,
construction, manufacture, repair , alteration or landscaping of a
[new] residence [, of] or appurtenance or a defect in an [alteration
of or] addition to [an existing] a residence [, or of an appurtenance
and includes, without limitation, the design, construction,
manufacture, repair or landscaping of a new residence, of an
alteration of or addition to an existing residence,] or [of] an
appurtenance:
1. Which presents an unreasonable risk of injury to a person or
property; or
2. Which is not completed in compliance with any applicable
building code and in a good and workmanlike manner in
accordance with the generally accepted standard of care in the
industry for that type of repair and [proximately] :
(a) Proximately causes physical damage to the residence, an
appurtenance or the real property to which the residence or
appurtenance is affixed [.] ; or
-
*AB505*

– 3 –
(b) Creates a substantial risk of causing the damage described
in paragraph (a).
Sec. 2. NRS 40.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.630 1. “Residence” means any dwelling in which title to
the [individual units] unit is transferred to the owners.
2. As used in this section, “dwelling” includes a single-family
house.
Sec. 3. NRS 40.6472 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.6472 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 40.670 and
40.672, a written response must be sent by certified mail, return
receipt requested, to a claimant who gives notice of a constructional
defect pursuant to NRS 40.645:
(a) By the contractor not later than 90 days after the contractor
receives the notice; and
(b) If notice was sent to a subcontractor, supplier or design
professional, by the subcontractor, supplier or design professional
not later than 90 days after the date that the subcontractor, supplier
or design professional receives the notice.
2. The written response sent pursuant to subsection 1 must
respond to each constructional defect in the notice and:
(a) Must state whether the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or
design professional has elected to [repair] :
(1) Repair the defect or cause the defect to be repaired. [If an
election to repair is included in the response and the repair will
cause the claimant to move from the claimant’s home during the
repair, the election must also include monetary compensation in an
amount reasonably necessary for temporary housing or for storage
of household items, or for both, if necessary.]
(2) Enter into mediation or waive mediation in writing
pursuant to NRS 40.680. Failure to include the statement required
by this subparagraph in the written response shall be deemed a
written waiver of the requirement to submit the matter to
mediation pursuant to NRS 40.680.
(b) [May] Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) of
subsection 3, may include a proposal for monetary compensation,
which may include contribution from a subcontractor, supplier or
design professional.
(c) May disclaim liability for the constructional defect and state
the reasons for such a disclaimer.
3. In addition to the requirements prescribed by subsection 2,
if an election to repair is included in the written response sent
pursuant to subsection 1, the written response must:
(a) Include a proposal for monetary compensation in an
amount reasonably necessary for temporary housing or for
-
*AB505*

– 4 –
storage of household items, or both, if the repair will cause the
claimant to move from the claimant’s home during the repair;
(b) Specify in reasonable detail the:
(1) Defect to be repaired;
(2) Method to be used to repair the defect; and
(3) Nature and extent of the repair; and
(c) Reasonably identify the proximate location of the defect to
be repaired.
4. If the claimant is a homeowners’ association, the association
shall send a copy of the response to each member of the association
not later than 30 days after receiving the response.
[4.] 5. If the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design
professional has elected not to repair the constructional defect, the
claimant or contractor may bring a cause of action for the
constructional defect or amend a complaint to add a cause of action
for the constructional defect.
[5.] 6. If the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design
professional has elected to repair the constructional defect, the
claimant must provide the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or
design professional with a reasonable opportunity to repair the
constructional defect.
Sec. 4. NRS 40.649 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.649 1. [If a] A contractor, subcontractor, supplier or
design professional shall maintain a policy of insurance which
covers liability for acts or omissions actionable pursuant to NRS
40.600 to 40.695, inclusive.
2. A contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design
professional who receives written notice of a constructional defect
[, the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design professional may]
shall present the claim to [an] the insurer which has issued [a] the
policy of insurance [that covers all or any portion of the business of
the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design professional.
2. If the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design
professional presents the] required by subsection 1.
3. An insurer that receives a claim [to the insurer] pursuant to
[this section, the insurer:] subsection 2 must:
(a) [Must treat] Treat the claim as if a civil action has been
brought against the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design
professional; and
(b) [Must provide] Provide coverage to the extent available
under the policy of insurance as if a civil action has been brought
against the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design
professional.
[3. A contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design professional
is not required to present a claim to the insurer pursuant to this
-
*AB505*

– 5 –
section, and the failure to present such a claim to the insurer does
not relieve the insurer of any duty under the policy of insurance to
the contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design professional.]
Sec. 5. NRS 40.652 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.652 1. At any time after a claimant has given notice
pursuant to NRS 40.645 and before the claimant commences an
action or amends a complaint to add a cause of action for a
constructional defect against a contractor, subcontractor, supplier or
design professional, the claimant or any contractor, subcontractor,
supplier or design professional who has received notice pursuant to
NRS 40.645 or 40.646 may serve upon one or more other parties a
written offer to allow judgment to be entered without action in
accordance with the terms and conditions of the offer of judgment.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, any such written
offer must be unconditional and for a set amount.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, if, within [10]
14 days after the date of service of an offer of judgment, the party to
whom the offer was made serves written notice that the offer is
accepted, the party who made the offer or the party who accepted
the offer may file the offer, the notice of acceptance and proof of
service with the clerk of the district court. Upon receipt by the clerk,
the clerk shall enter a judgment according to the terms of the offer.
Any judgment entered pursuant to this section shall be deemed a
compromise settlement. The judgment, the offer, the notice of
acceptance and proof of service, with the judgment endorsed,
become the judgment roll.
3. If the offer of judgment is not accepted pursuant to
subsection 2 within [10] 14 days after the date of service, the offer
shall be deemed rejected by the party to whom it was made and
withdrawn by the party who made it. The rejection of an offer does
not preclude any party from making another offer pursuant to this
section. Evidence of a rejected offer is not admissible in any
proceeding other than a proceeding to determine costs and fees.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a party who
rejects an offer of judgment fails to obtain a more favorable
judgment in an action for a constructional defect, the court:
(a) May not award to the party any costs or attorney’s fees;
(b) May not award to the party any interest on the judgment for
the period from the date of service of the offer to the date of entry of
the judgment;
(c) Shall order the party to pay the taxable costs incurred by the
party who made the offer; and
(d) May order the party to pay to the party who made the offer
any or all of the following:
-
*AB505*

– 6 –
(1) A reasonable sum to cover any costs incurred by the party
who made the offer for each expert witness whose services were
reasonably necessary to prepare for and conduct the trial of the case.
(2) Any applicable interest on the judgment for the period
from the date of service of the offer to the date of entry of the
judgment.
(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the party who
made the offer for the period from the date of service of the offer to
the date of entry of the judgment. If the attorney of the party who
made the offer is collecting a contingent fee, the amount of any
attorney’s fees awarded to the party pursuant to this subparagraph
must be deducted from that contingent fee.
5. To determine whether a party who rejected an offer of
judgment failed to obtain a more favorable judgment:
(a) If the offer provided that the court would award costs, the
court must compare the amount of the offer with the principal
amount of the judgment, without inclusion of costs.
(b) If the offer precluded a separate award of costs, the court
must compare the amount of the offer with the sum of:
(1) The principal amount of the judgment; and
(2) The amount of taxable costs that the claimant who
obtained the judgment incurred before the date of service of the
offer.
6. Multiple parties may make a joint offer of judgment
pursuant to this section.
7. A party may make to two or more other parties pursuant to
this section an apportioned offer of judgment that is conditioned
upon acceptance by all the parties to whom the apportioned offer is
made. Each party to whom such an offer is made may serve upon
the party who made the offer a separate written notice of acceptance
of the offer. If any party rejects the apportioned offer:
(a) The action must proceed as to all parties to whom the
apportioned offer was made, whether or not the other parties
accepted or rejected the offer; and
(b) The sanctions set forth in subsection 4:
(1) Apply to each party who rejected the apportioned offer.
(2) Do not apply to any party who accepted the apportioned
offer.
8. The sanctions set forth in subsection 4 do not apply to:
(a) An offer of judgment made to multiple parties who received
a notice pursuant to NRS 40.645 or 40.646 unless the same person is
authorized to decide whether to settle the claims against all the
parties to whom the offer is made and:
(1) There is a single common theory of liability against all
the parties to whom the offer is made;
-
*AB505*

– 7 –
(2) The liability of one or more of the parties to whom the
offer is made is entirely derivative of the liability of the remaining
parties to whom the offer is made; or
(3) The liability of all the parties to whom the offer is made
is entirely derivative of a common act or omission by another
person.
(b) An offer of judgment made to multiple claimants unless the
same person is authorized to decide whether to settle the claims of
all the claimants to whom the offer is made and:
(1) There is a single common theory of liability claimed by
all the claimants to whom the offer is made;
(2) The damages claimed by one or more of the claimants to
whom the offer is made are entirely derivative of an injury to the
remaining claimants to whom the offer is made; or
(3) The damages claimed by all the claimants to whom the
offer is made are entirely derivative of an injury to another person.
Sec. 6. NRS 40.655 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.655 1. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 40.650, in]
In a claim governed by NRS 40.600 to 40.695, inclusive, the
claimant may recover only the following damages to the extent
proximately caused by a constructional defect:
(a) The reasonable cost of any repairs already made that were
necessary and of any repairs yet to be made that are necessary to
cure any constructional defect that the contractor failed to cure and
the reasonable expenses of temporary housing reasonably necessary
during the repair;
(b) The reduction in market value of the residence or accessory
structure, if any, to the extent the reduction is because of structural
failure;
(c) The loss of the use of all or any part of the residence;
(d) The reasonable value of any other property damaged by the
constructional defect;
(e) Any additional costs reasonably incurred by the claimant,
including, but not limited to, any costs and fees incurred for the
retention of experts to:
(1) Ascertain the nature and extent of the constructional
defects;
(2) Evaluate appropriate corrective measures to estimate the
value of loss of use; and
(3) Estimate the value of loss of use, the cost of temporary
housing and the reduction of market value of the residence; and
(f) Any interest provided by statute [.] for damages otherwise
recoverable by the claimant pursuant to NRS 40.600 to 40.695,
inclusive.
-
*AB505*

– 8 –
2. If a contractor complies with the provisions of NRS 40.600
to 40.695, inclusive, the claimant may not recover from the
contractor, as a result of the constructional defect, any damages
other than damages authorized pursuant to NRS 40.600 to 40.695,
inclusive.
3. This section must not be construed as impairing any
contractual rights between a contractor and a subcontractor, supplier
or design professional.
4. As used in this section, “structural failure” means physical
damage to the load-bearing portion of a residence or appurtenance
caused by a failure of the load-bearing portion of the residence or
appurtenance.
Sec. 7. NRS 40.665 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.665 In addition to any other method provided for settling a
claim pursuant to NRS 40.600 to 40.695, inclusive, a contractor
may, pursuant to a written agreement entered into with a claimant,
settle a claim by repurchasing the claimant’s residence and the real
property upon which it is located. The agreement may include
provisions which reimburse the claimant for:
1. The market value of the residence as if no constructional
defect existed, except that if a residence is less than 2 years of age
and was purchased from the contractor against whom the claim is
brought, the market value is the price at which the residence was
sold to the claimant;
2. The value of any improvements made to the property by a
person other than the contractor;
3. Reasonable attorney’s fees and fees for experts; and
4. Any costs, including costs and expenses for moving and
costs, points and fees for loans.
[ Any offer of settlement made that includes the items listed in
this section shall be deemed reasonable for the purposes of
subsection 1 of NRS 40.650.]
Sec. 8. NRS 40.680 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.680 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
before a claimant commences an action or amends a complaint to
add a cause of action for a constructional defect against a contractor,
subcontractor, supplier or design professional, the matter must be
submitted to mediation, unless mediation is waived in writing by the
contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design professional [and the
claimant.] on or before the date by which the contractor,
subcontractor, supplier or design professional must send the
written response required by NRS 40.6472.
2. The claimant and each party alleged to have caused the
constructional defect must select a mediator by agreement. If the
claimant and the other parties fail to agree upon a mediator within
-
*AB505*

– 9 –
20 days after a mediator is first selected by the claimant, any party
may petition the American Arbitration Association, the Nevada
Arbitration Association, Nevada Dispute Resolution Services or any
other mediation service acceptable to the parties for the appointment
of a mediator. A mediator so appointed may discover only those
documents or records which are necessary to conduct the mediation.
The mediator shall convene the mediation within 30 days after the
matter is submitted to the mediator and shall complete the mediation
within 45 days after the matter is submitted to the mediator, unless
the parties agree to extend the time.
3. Before the mediation begins:
(a) The claimant shall deposit $50 with the mediation service;
and
(b) Each other party shall deposit with the mediation service, in
equal shares, the remaining amount estimated by the mediation
service as necessary to pay the fees and expenses of the mediator for
the first session of mediation and shall deposit additional amounts
demanded by the mediation service as incurred for that purpose.
4. [Unless otherwise agreed, the total fees for each day of
mediation and the mediator must not exceed $750 per day.
5.] If the parties do not reach an agreement concerning the
matter during mediation or if any party who is alleged to have
caused the constructional defect fails to pay the required fees and
appear, the claimant may commence an action or amend a complaint
to add a cause of action for the constructional defect in court and:
(a) The reasonable costs and fees of the mediation are
recoverable by the prevailing party as costs of the action.
(b) Any party may petition the court in which the action is
commenced for the appointment of a special master.
[6.] 5. A special master appointed pursuant to subsection [5] 4
may:
(a) Review all pleadings, papers or documents filed with the
court concerning the action.
(b) Coordinate the discovery of any books, records, papers or
other documents by the parties, including the disclosure of witnesses
and the taking of the deposition of any party.
(c) Order any inspections on the site of the property by a party
and any consultants or experts of a party.
(d) Order settlement conferences and attendance at those
conferences by any representative of the insurer of a party.
(e) Require any attorney representing a party to provide
statements of legal and factual issues concerning the action.
(f) Refer to the judge who appointed the special master or to the
presiding judge of the court in which the action is commenced any
matter requiring assistance from the court.
-
*AB505*

– 10 –
 The special master shall not, unless otherwise agreed by the
parties, personally conduct any settlement conferences or engage in
any ex parte meetings regarding the action.
[7.] 6. Upon application by a party to the court in which the
action is commenced, any decision or other action taken by a special
master appointed pursuant to this section may be appealed to the
court for a decision.
[8.] 7. A report issued by a mediator or special master that
indicates that a party has failed to appear before the mediator or
special master or to mediate in good faith is admissible in the action,
but a statement or admission made by a party in the course of
mediation is not admissible.
Sec. 9. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to any
claim that arises on or after October 1, 2025.
Sec. 10. NRS 40.650 is hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
40.650 Effect of rejecting reasonable offer of settlement;
effect of failing to take certain actions concerning defect; effect
of coverage available under homeowner’s warranty.
1. If a claimant unreasonably rejects a reasonable written offer
of settlement made as part of a response pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of NRS 40.6472 and thereafter commences an action
governed by NRS 40.600 to 40.695, inclusive, the court in which
the action is commenced may:
(a) Deny the claimant’s attorney’s fees and costs; and
(b) Award attorney’s fees and costs to the contractor.
 Any sums paid under a builder’s warranty, other than sums paid
in satisfaction of claims that are collateral to any coverage issued to
or by the contractor, must be deducted from any recovery.
2. If a contractor, subcontractor, supplier or design professional
fails to:
(a) Comply with the provisions of NRS 40.6472;
(b) Make an offer of settlement;
(c) Make a good faith response to the claim asserting no
liability;
(d) Agree to a mediator or accept the appointment of a mediator
pursuant to NRS 40.680; or
(e) Participate in mediation,
 the limitations on damages and defenses to liability provided in
NRS 40.600 to 40.695, inclusive, do not apply and the claimant may
-
*AB505*

– 11 –
commence an action or amend a complaint to add a cause of action
for a constructional defect without satisfying any other requirement
of NRS 40.600 to 40.695, inclusive.
3. If a residence or appurtenance that is the subject of the claim
is covered by a builder’s warranty, a claimant shall diligently pursue
a claim under the builder’s warranty.
4. Nothing in this section prohibits an offer of judgment
pursuant to Rule 68 of the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure or NRS
17.117 or 40.652.
H
-
*AB505*